data/spelling-dict/hunspell/pt_PT_90.aff
SFX q Y 32
SFX q   ologia          ólogo           ologia          +CAT=a_nc,G=m,N=s
SFX q   ologia          óloga           ologia          +CAT=a_nc,G=f,N=s
SFX q   ologia          ólogos          ologia          +CAT=a_nc,G=m,N=p
SFX q   ologia          ólogas          ologia          +CAT=a_nc,G=f,N=p
SFX q   afia            áfico           afia            +CAT=adj,G=m,N=s
SFX q   afia            áfica           afia            +CAT=adj,G=f,N=s
SFX q   afia            áficos          afia            +CAT=adj,G=m,N=p
SFX q   afia            áficas          afia            +CAT=adj,G=f,N=p
SFX q   omania          ómano           omania          +CAT=a_nc,G=m,N=s
SFX q   omania          ómana           omania          +CAT=a_nc,G=m,N=s
SFX q   omania          ómanos          omania          +CAT=a_nc,G=m,N=s
SFX q   omania          ómanas          omania          +CAT=a_nc,G=m,N=s
SFX q   ofobia          ófobo           ofobia          +CAT=adj,G=m,N=s
SFX q   ofobia          ófoba           ofobia          +CAT=adj,G=f,N=s
SFX q   ofobia          ófobos          ofobia          +CAT=adj,G=m,N=p
SFX q   ofobia          ófobas          ofobia          +CAT=adj,G=f,N=p
SFX q   ofilia          ófilo           ofilia          +CAT=adj,G=m,N=s
SFX q   ofilia          ófila           ofilia          +CAT=adj,G=f,N=s
SFX q   ofilia          ófilos          ofilia          +CAT=adj,G=m,N=p
SFX q   ofilia          ófilas          ofilia          +CAT=adj,G=f,N=p
SFX q   ídio            ida             cídio           +CAT=adj,G=_,N=s
SFX q   ídio            idas            cídio           +CAT=adj,G=_,N=p
SFX q   ia              a               patia           +CAT=adj,G=_,N=s
SFX q   ia              as              patia           +CAT=adj,G=_,N=p
SFX q   ura             or              cultura         +CAT=a_nc,G=m,N=s
SFX q   ura             ora             cultura         +CAT=a_nc,G=m,N=s
SFX q   ura             ores            cultura         +CAT=a_nc,G=m,N=s
SFX q   ura             oras            cultura         +CAT=a_nc,G=m,N=s
SFX q   cia             ta              cracia          +CAT=a_nc,G=_,N=s
SFX q   cia             tas             cracia          +CAT=a_nc,G=_,N=p
SFX q   smo             sta             eísmo           +CAT=adj,G=_,N=s
SFX q   smo             stas            eísmo           +CAT=adj,G=_,N=p

SFX r Y 46
SFX r   ogia            ógico           logia           +CAT=adj,G=m,N=s
SFX r   ogia            ógica           logia           +CAT=adj,G=f,N=s
SFX r   ogia            ógicos          logia           +CAT=adj,G=m,N=p
SFX r   ogia            ógicas          logia           +CAT=adj,G=f,N=p
SFX r   ografia         ógrafo          ografia         +CAT=a_nc,G=m,N=s
SFX r   ografia         ógrafa          ografia         +CAT=a_nc,G=f,N=s
SFX r   ografia         ógrafos         ografia         +CAT=a_nc,G=m,N=p
SFX r   ografia         ógrafas         ografia         +CAT=a_nc,G=f,N=p
SFX r   omia            ómico           nomia           +CAT=adj,G=m,N=s
SFX r   omia            ómica           nomia           +CAT=adj,G=f,N=s
SFX r   omia            ómicos          nomia           +CAT=adj,G=m,N=p
SFX r   omia            ómicas          nomia           +CAT=adj,G=f,N=p
SFX r   ia              íaco            mania           +CAT=adj,G=m,N=s
SFX r   ia              íaca            mania           +CAT=adj,G=m,N=s
SFX r   ia              íacos           mania           +CAT=adj,G=m,N=s
SFX r   ia              íacas           mania           +CAT=adj,G=m,N=s
SFX r   acia            ático           cracia          +CAT=adj,G=m,N=s
SFX r   acia            ática           cracia          +CAT=adj,G=f,N=s
SFX r   acia            áticos          cracia          +CAT=adj,G=m,N=p
SFX r   acia            áticas          cracia          +CAT=adj,G=f,N=p
SFX r   icultura        ícola           icultura        +CAT=adj,G=_,N=s
SFX r   icultura        ícolas          icultura        +CAT=adj,G=_,N=p
SFX r   arquia          árquico         arquia          +CAT=adj,G=m,N=s
SFX r   arquia          árquica         arquia          +CAT=adj,G=f,N=s
SFX r   arquia          árquicos        arquia          +CAT=adj,G=m,N=p
SFX r   arquia          árquicas        arquia          +CAT=adj,G=f,N=p
SFX r   obia            óbico           fobia           +CAT=adj,G=m,N=s
SFX r   obia            óbica           fobia           +CAT=adj,G=f,N=s
SFX r   obia            óbicos          fobia           +CAT=adj,G=m,N=p
SFX r   obia            óbicas          fobia           +CAT=adj,G=f,N=p
SFX r   atia            ático           patia           +CAT=adj,G=m,N=s
SFX r   atia            ática           patia           +CAT=adj,G=f,N=s
SFX r   atia            áticos          patia           +CAT=adj,G=m,N=p
SFX r   atia            áticas          patia           +CAT=adj,G=f,N=p
SFX r   etria           étrico          metria          +CAT=adj,G=m,N=s
SFX r   etria           étrica          metria          +CAT=adj,G=m,N=s
SFX r   etria           étricos         metria          +CAT=adj,G=f,N=p
SFX r   etria           étricas         metria          +CAT=adj,G=f,N=p
SFX r   orfia           órfico          morfia          +CAT=adj,G=m,N=s
SFX r   orfia           órfica          morfia          +CAT=adj,G=f,N=s
SFX r   orfia           órficos         morfia          +CAT=adj,G=m,N=p
SFX r   orfia           órficas         morfia          +CAT=adj,G=f,N=p
SFX r   morfismo        mórfico         morfismo        +CAT=adj,G=m,N=s
SFX r   morfismo        mórfica         morfismo        +CAT=adj,G=f,N=s
SFX r   morfismo        mórficos        morfismo        +CAT=adj,G=m,N=p
SFX r   morfismo        mórficas        morfismo        +CAT=adj,G=f,N=p

SFX N Y 8
SFX N   r               díssimo         [ia]r           +CAT=adj,GR=sup,G=m,N=s
SFX N   r               díssima         [ia]r           +CAT=adj,GR=sup,G=f,N=s
SFX N   r               díssimas        [ia]r           +CAT=adj,GR=sup,G=f,N=p
SFX N   r               díssimos        [ia]r           +CAT=adj,GR=sup,G=m,N=p
SFX N   er              idíssimo        er              +CAT=adj,GR=sup,G=m,N=s
SFX N   er              idíssima        er              +CAT=adj,GR=sup,G=f,N=s
SFX N   er              idíssimas       er              +CAT=adj,GR=sup,G=f,N=p
SFX N   er              idíssimos       er              +CAT=adj,GR=sup,G=m,N=p

SFX W Y 12
SFX W   r               dinho           [ia]r           +CAT=adj,GR=dim,G=m,N=s
SFX W   r               dinha           [ia]r           +CAT=adj,GR=dim,G=f,N=s
SFX W   r               dinhas          [ia]r           +CAT=adj,GR=dim,G=f,N=p
SFX W   r               dinhos          [ia]r           +CAT=adj,GR=dim,G=m,N=p
SFX W   er              idinho          er              +CAT=adj,GR=dim,G=m,N=s
SFX W   er              idinha          er              +CAT=adj,GR=dim,G=f,N=s
SFX W   er              idinhas         er              +CAT=adj,GR=dim,G=f,N=p
SFX W   er              idinhos         er              +CAT=adj,GR=dim,G=m,N=p
SFX W   0               zinho           [^ã][eo]        +GR=dim
SFX W   0               inho            l               +GR=dim
SFX W   0               zinhos          [^ã][eo]        +N=p,GR=dim
SFX W   0               inhos           l               +N=p,GR=dim
