data/spelling-dict/hunspell/pt_PT_90.dic
abismar/XYPLN
acentuar/XYPLSBcN
admirar/XYPLcDBN
afinar/XYPLcMDW
agarrar/XYPLDW
agricultura/prq
agrologia/qrp
agromania/rp
agronomia/pr
amorfia/pr
analogia/pr
anamorfismo/pr
anarquia/prti
androfilia/q
androfobia/q
anfibiologia/q
anglofilia/pq
anglofobia/pq
anglomania/rp
animar/XYPLcDnvBN
antinomia/pr
antipatia/pr
antiteísmo/pq
antologia/pq
antropologia/qtr
antropomorfia/pr
antropomorfismo/pr
apatia/rp
apertar/XYPLSMDBW
apicultura/prq
aracnofilia/q
arboricídio/pq
arboricultura/prq
aristocracia/qrp
arqueologia/rqt
arriscar/XYPLBN
arrumar/XYPLScDW
arvicultura/pq
assimetria/pr
assiriologia/qt
astrobiologia/pr
astrofobia/q
astrologia/qrp
astrometria/pr
astronomia/rp
ateísmo/pq
audiometria/pr
autarquia/pr
autobiografia/pq
autocracia/qrp
autografia/q
automorfismo/pr
autonomia/ptir/p
avicultura/prq
axiologia/pr
bacteriologia/qtr
bailomania/rp
barometria/rp
bibliofilia/q
bibliofobia/q
bibliografia/pqr
bibliomania/q
biogeografia/pq
biografia/pqr
biologia/pq
biometria/pr
biotecnologia/pr
biotipologia/pr
brasiliofobia/q
burocracia/qpr/p
cafeicultura/pq
calcografia/pqr
caligrafia/pq
canicultura/pq
caracterologia/pr
cardiologia/prt
cardiopatia/pqr
cartografia/qrp
casal/Wp
cenografia/pqr
cerealicultura/prq
cinematografia/pqr
citologia/pr
citricultura/prq
claustrofobia/pqr
cleptofobia/pq
cleptomania/pqr
clerocracia/rp
clerofobia/rp
climatologia/qrt
colorimetria/pr
columbofilia/q
conjugicídio/pq
coprofilia/q
coreografia/pqr
cosmobiologia/pr
cosmografia/prq
cosmologia/pqrt
cosmometria/pr
cotonicultura/pq
craniologia/qrt
criminologia/prqt
criptografia/pqr
criptologia/qt
cristalografia/pqr
cristologia/prt
cromatografia/pqr
cronografia/prq
cronometria/pr
crustaceologia/qt
dactilografia/pqr
datilografia/pqr
deísmo/pq
demografia/pqr
demonologia/rt
deontologia/qrt
dermatologia/qtr
destacar/XYPLMvBN
dialetologia/prtq
discografia/pq
divertir/YPLMNm
dramatologia/rt
duende/pW
eclesiologia/pr
ecometria/pr
econometria/pr
egiptologia/rtq
engraçar/XYPLN
enologia/prq
entomologia/prqt
epidemiologia/qtr
epigrafia/pq
epimorfismo/pr
epistemologia/pqr
epistolografia/pqr
ergonomia/rp
escatologia/rp
escultura/pq
espectrografia/pr
espetrografia/pr
espectrometria/pr
espetrometria/pr
espeleologia/prqt
estenografia/pqr
estomatologia/pqr
estratigrafia/pq
etimologia/pq
etiologia/pr
etnografia/pqr
etnologia/qtr
etnomusicologia/prq
farmacologia/pqrt
fenomenologia/pqr
filologia/pqr
fisiografia/q
fisiologia/qt
fisionomia/prt
fisiopatia/pq
floricultura/prq
fobia/pr
fonofobia/q
fonografia/pqr
fonologia/q
fonometria/pr
formicídio/pq
fotografia/pqr
fotolitografia/pq
fotologia/rp
fotometria/pr
francofilia/q
francofobia/q
fratricídio/pq
fruticultura/prq
futurologia/rqt
galinicultura/pq
gastronomia/pr
genealogia/pr
genocídio/pq
geografia/pr
geologia/q
geometria/pr
ginecocracia/pr
ginecologia/pqr
gnoseologia/rp
grafologia/pqr
gramatologia/rp
heliografia/pq
hidroagricultura/pqr
hidrofilia/q
hidrofobia/q
hidrografia/pqr
hidrologia/pqr
hierarquia/pr
hierocracia/pr
hipnologia/q
historiografia/pqr
holografia/pq
homeomorfismo/pr
homeopatia/pqr
homicídio/pq
homofobia/pqr
homografia/qrp
homologia/rp
homomorfismo/pr
horticultura/prq
icnografia/pqr
iconofilia/q
iconografia/pqr
iconologia/rp
ideologia/pq
indianologia/q
infanticídio/pq
interferometria/pr
isomorfia/pr
lexicografia/pqr
lexicologia/qrp
lexiologia/rp
litografia/pqr
litologia/rp
mamografia/pr
mecanografia/pqr
megalomania/pqr
melomania/qrp
metamorfismo/pr
metodologia/pq
metrologia/rp
microbiologia/rq
microfotografia/pqr
microrradiografia/pqr
mitologia/pqr
monocultura/pq
monografia/pqr
monologia/rp
monoteísmo/pq
morfismo/pr
museologia/qtr
musicologia/rqt
necrofilia/q
necrofobia/q
necrologia/qrp
nefrologia/qtr
neurologia/qtr
neuropatia/pqr
neuropatologia/rp
neuropsicologia/qrp
nevrologia/qrp
oceanografia/pqr
oftalmologia/qtr
oligarquia/pr
olivicultura/prq
oncologia/rp
osteopatia/pqr
ostricultura/pq
paleografia/pqr
paleologia/qt
paleozoologia/qt
papel/ptW
parapsicologia/qrp
pastel/ptW
pedofilia/q
pedologia/pr
pictografia/pq
piscicultura/prq
pluviometria/pr
policultura/pq
polimorfismo/pr
pomicultura/prq
pornografia/pqr
psicografia/pq
psicopatia/pqr
radioastronomia/rp
radiografia/pq
radiometria/pr
reprografia/pq
rizicultura/prq
romanologia/q
serigrafia/pq
sexologia/prq
silvicultura/prq
simbologia/rp
sintomatologia/rp
sismologia/qrp
suicídio/pq
suinicultura/prq
taxilogia/rp
taxionomia/pr
tecnocracia/qrp
tecnologia/pqr
teísmo/pq
telefotografia/pqr
telefotometria/pr
teleologia/rp
teocracia/qrp
teratologia/prq
terminologia/pr
tipografia/pqr
tomografia/pq
topografia/pqr
toxicologia/pqr
traumatologia/rp
uranometria/pr
urologia/rtq
vinicultura/prq
viticultura/prq
vitivinicultura/prq
vulcanologia/prqt
xerografia/pq
zoologia/qtrp
